Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 15 Senior Citizen Service Districts

§ 18-15-101.
Definition.

As used in this chapter “district” or “special district” means a senior citizen service district organized under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to in this section, means §§

18-15-101

through

18-15-111

.

§ 18-15-102.
Formation of district; mill levy.

A senior citizen service district, with boundaries of any area within county boundaries, may be formed in any county as provided by this chapter.

Any board of county commissioners shall submit the question of establishing a special district to the county clerk not later than the first Monday in June in even-numbered years for submission of the question of establishing the special district to the resident electors of the proposed district at the next primary election if:

A majority of the board of county commissioners adopt a resolution favoring establishing a district; or

The board of county commissioners receives a petition for the establishment of a special district signed by qualified electors resident in the proposed district equal in number to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the voters resident in the proposed district who voted in the last general election. The county clerk shall verify the signatures before consideration by the board pursuant to this paragraph. The petition shall state:

The proposed name of the district;

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description need not be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but is sufficient if generally accurate;

A request that the board of county commissioners define the boundaries for the district. When more than one (1) petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the board may consolidate all or any such petitions, or may exclude from any petition areas in conflict with another petition or petitions.

The ballot proposition for formation of a district shall appear substantially as follows:

Shall the (name of district) senior citizen service district be established with a maximum levy of mills (not to exceed two (2) mills) to be imposed on the taxable property of the district? Yes •
No •

Click to view

If the proposition to authorize a mill levy is approved by the qualified electors of the proposed district, the proposition to impose a levy in the same or at a different amount not to exceed two (2) mills, shall be submitted to the resident electors within the proposed district at the first general election held two (2) years after the election authorizing the district and every four (4) years thereafter, until defeated. If the proposition to impose or continue a mill levy is defeated, the proposition shall not be submitted to the electors for a period of not less than one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2017 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the second to last sentence substituted “every four (4) years” for “at each general election.”

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to in this section, means §§

18-15-101

through

18-15-111

.

§ 18-15-103.
When district considered established; failure to establish district.

If a majority of the electors in the proposed district voting at the election vote for the establishment of the proposed district, the board of county commissioners shall enter that fact upon its records and the district is established.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1.

§ 18-15-104.
District a body corporate; name; powers.

Each district established under this chapter is a body corporate and shall be designated by the name of “the . . . . . senior citizen service district.”

The district may:

Hold property and be a party to contracts;

Sue and be sued;

Through its governing board acquire property for district purposes by gift, devise, bequest or purchase or contract for the acquisition by purchase or lease of real and personal property and equipment;

Convey, lease and otherwise dispose of property for district purposes;

Establish sinking funds for district purposes;

Make rules and regulations as necessary for the proper operation of the district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to in this section, means §§

18-15-101

through

18-15-111

.

§ 18-15-105.
Election of trustees; generally.

The district shall be managed by a board of five (5) trustees who shall serve without compensation.

Members of the board shall be elected at the general election immediately following the primary election establishing the district. At the first board election, three (3) members shall be elected for two (2) year terms and two (2) members shall be elected for four (4) year terms and until their successors are elected and qualified at the regular scheduled subsequent board election. The board members shall decide by lot which members shall serve these terms. Thereafter, members shall be elected for terms of four (4) years.

For districts existing prior to July 1, 2017, at the first subsequent board election after the effective date of this act, three (3) members shall be elected for two (2) year terms and two (2) members shall be elected for four (4) year terms. The board members shall decide by lot which members shall serve these terms. Thereafter, members shall be elected for terms of four (4) years.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2017 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b) deleted “and at each general election thereafter, until the proposition establishing the district is defeated” from the end of the first sentence, added the second, third, and fourth sentence; added (c); and made a related change.

§ 18-15-106.
Candidates to file petition; printing names of candidates on ballot; publication of names.

Candidates for the office of special district trustee shall file an application in the office of the county clerk in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTION FOR SENIOR CITIZEN SERVE DISTRICT TRUSTEE I, the undersigned, certify that I was born , ; and that I have been a resident of the State of Wyoming ; that I am a registered voter of senior citizen service district and I do hereby request that my , be printed on the ballot of the election to be held on the , , as a candidate for the office for a term of four (4) years. I hereby declare that if I am elected, I will qualify for the office. on (year) since the name, day of (year) of Dated: (Signature of Candidate) (Residence Address)

Click to view

Except for the election of the initial board of trustees, applications under subsection (a) of this section shall be filed not more than ninety-six (96) days and not later than seventy-four (74) days prior to the election. For the election of the initial board of trustees, applications shall be filed not later than ten (10) days after the primary election establishing the district.

All names filed shall be printed on a ballot and furnished to each elector at each polling place on the day of election. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a voter from writing in the name of any qualified person on the ballot. The names of all persons filing as candidates shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county not later than the Saturday preceding the election.

The official ballot shall contain the following information:

The name of the district;

The number of offices to be filled, the length of term for each office and the number and names of candidates for each office for whom each voter is entitled to vote.

The names of candidates shall appear without party designation, one (1) name to a line. The names of candidates shall be rotated by precinct. Sufficient blank lines for write-in candidates shall be provided for each office.

Unless otherwise provided, a district election shall be governed by the laws regulating statewide elections and be conducted and canvassed by the same election officials, using the same poll lists and at the same times and polling places, as county elections.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2017 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) in the “Application for Election For Senior Citizen Serve District Trustee” substituted “for a term of four (4) years” for “for a term of two (2) years.”

§ 18-15-107.
Vacancies on district board of trustees.

If a vacancy occurs on any district board of trustees, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment made by the board of trustees. The appointee shall hold the office until his successor is elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1.

§ 18-15-108.
Oath of trustees; bond.

All trustees shall, within ten (10) days after their election, appear before a person qualified to administer oaths and take an oath for the faithful performance of their duties in accordance with law and shall transmit a written copy of the oath to the county clerk for the first election and to the secretary of the district thereafter.

Any district trustee authorized to handle funds, prior to entering upon the duties of his office, shall execute and file with the county clerk his bond with one (1) or more sureties to be approved by the county clerk, payable to the state of Wyoming in the penal sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance by the trustee of his official duties and the faithful accounting by him for all funds and property of the district that shall come into his possession or control during his term of office. The premium, if any, on any bond shall be paid out of the funds of the district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1.

§ 18-15-109.
Selection of officers of board of trustees; quorum; trustees not to be interested in contracts, work done or property purchased by district.

Annually, not later than December 1, the board of trustees shall choose from their number a president, a treasurer and a secretary of the district.

The board of trustees may hold regular, special or recessed meetings as the board determines. All meetings shall be in accordance with W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

.

A majority of trustees constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business.

No trustee shall be directly or indirectly interested financially in any contract, work done or property purchased by the district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407” in (b).

§ 18-15-110.
Administration of finances; assessment and levy of taxes.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 3.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the levy for county purposes, shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district for necessary expenses of the district as determined by the district board. In no case shall the tax for the district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of two (2) mills on each dollar of assessed valuation. The taxes shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes. The tax levy provided by this section is not part of the general county mill levy.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (a), which read: “The board of trustees shall administer the finances of the district in accordance with W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-124

.”

§ 18-15-111.
Fund; disposition of revenue; contract requirements.

The revenues collected under the tax levy authorized by W.S.

18-15-110

shall be remitted by the county treasurer to the district to a separate account and shall be used solely for senior citizen programs or services authorized by this subsection and for the payment of bond premiums authorized by W.S. 18-15-108(b), but shall not be used for the purchase of real property or for capital construction expenditures. Senior citizen programs or services are limited to the following:

Establishment or maintenance of programs or services for senior citizen centers;

The expansion of existing senior citizen centers to provide programs such as nutrition, health, in-home services, socialization or transportation; or

Participation in programs or services administered through the aging division of the Wyoming department of health, but only programs offered by the department as of January 1, 2017.

The district may provide directly or contract for the provision of senior citizen programs or services. Contracts for the provision of senior citizen programs or services shall:

Require the provider, if an organization or agency, to be incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation prior to the receipt of any funds;

Specify the manner in which the funds are expended and the programs or services provided; and

Require the provider of the programs or services to present an annual budget for review to determine compliance with this chapter and for approval by the district.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 81, § 1; 2017 ch. 157, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or services authorized by this subsection,” and substituted “or services are limited to the following” for ‘may include”; in (a)(ii), substituted “programs such as nutrition, health, in-home services, socialization or transportation; or” for “programs of nutrition, health or transportation if other sources of grant funds are not available”; added (a)(iii); inserted “or services” twice in the introductory language of (b) and in (b)(iii); and in (b)(ii), inserted “programs or.”

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to in this section, means §§

18-15-101

through

18-15-111

.